Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.221, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Investigated natural deaths. new text end new text begin (a) If a medical examiner or coroner investigates a death and declines jurisdiction based on the medical examiner's or coroner's determination that the death was due to natural causes, cause of death information for the death must be provided by: new text end new text begin (1) a physician present at the time of death; new text end new text begin (2) a physician or associate of a physician who provided medical treatment for the deceased before death; or new text end new text begin (3) a physician who has direct knowledge of the circumstances and cause of death and has access to the medical record of the deceased. new text end new text begin (b) If there is no physician meeting the description in paragraph (a), clause (1) or (3), a physician or associate of a physician meeting the description in paragraph (a), clause (2), has 72 hours to complete the requirements in paragraph (a) after the individual receives notification that: new text end new text begin (1) the medical examiner or coroner declined jurisdiction; and new text end new text begin (2) no physician meeting the description in paragraph (a), clause (1) or (3), exists. new text end new text begin (c) A medical examiner or coroner that has declined jurisdiction may provide cause of death information if: new text end new text begin (1) the time period for the information to be provided by a physician or associate of a physician set forth in paragraph (b) has elapsed; or new text end new text begin (2) the medical examiner or coroner has received a statement that the physician or associate of a physician refuses to provide the cause of death information. new text end new text begin (d) If a medical examiner or coroner that has declined jurisdiction provides cause of death information pursuant to paragraph (c), the medical examiner or coroner may recover all costs incurred in providing the information from the refusing physician or associate of a physician or from the facility or organization that employs the refusing physician or associate of a physician at the time of refusal. new text end